Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.21
Enclosure, defined.

Enclosure means the use of rigid, durable construction materials that are mechanically fastened to the substrate in order to act as a barrier between lead-based paint and the environment.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 23.